Hawaii statutes.
[§159-38] Registration. No person
shall engage in business, in or for intrastate commerce, (1) as a meat broker,
renderer, or animal food manufacturer, or (2) as a wholesaler of any carcasses,
or parts or products of the carcasses, of any cattle, sheep, swine, goats,
horses, mules, or other equines, whether intended for human food or other
purposes, or (3) as a public warehouse worker storing any meat or meat products
in or for commerce, or (4) in buying, selling, or transporting any dead, dying,
disabled, or diseased animals of the specified kinds, or parts of the carcasses
of any animal that died otherwise than by slaughter, unless the person has
registered with the board the person's name, and the address of each place of
business at which, and all trade names under which, the person conducts such
business. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1; gen ch 1985, 1993]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next